Colorado, session 2025B, SB005.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado: SECTIONÂ 1.Â Â In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1206, amend (1)(g) and (1)(h); and add (1)(i) and (5) as follows: 10-16-1206.Â Â Health insurance affordability cash fund - creation - repeal. (1)Â Â There is created in the state treasury the health insurance affordability cash fund. The fund consists of: (g)Â Â The federal share of the medical assistance payments received pursuant to section 25.5-4-503 (2); and (h)Â Â Gifts, grants, or donations received from private or public sources; and (i)Â Â Any other money that may be appropriated or transferred to the fund. (5)Â (a)Â Â On September 1, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer two hundred sixty-four thousand two hundred sixty-eight dollars from the general fund to the fund. (b)Â Â This subsection (5) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026. SECTIONÂ 2.Â Â In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-2-105.8, add (4.7) as follows: 33-2-105.8.Â Â Reintroduction of gray wolves on designated lands west of the continental divide - public input in commission development of restoration plan - compensation to owners of livestock - definitions - repeal. (4.7)Â (a)Â Â The division shall not use money appropriated from the general fund for state fiscal year 2025-26 for the purpose of acquiring or reintroducing gray wolves. The division may use money appropriated for state fiscal year 2025-26 for the purposes listed in subsections (2)(e)(I) and (2)(e)(II) of this section. (b)Â Â This subsection (4.7) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026. SECTIONÂ 3.Â Â Appropriation to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XV (5)(A), the affected totals, and footnote 79 as follows: Section 2. Appropriation. Part XV DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES (5) DIVISION OF PARKS AND WILDLIFE (A) Colorado Parks and Wildlife Operations Agency Name or Title Item & Subtotal Total General Fund General Fund Exempt Cash Funds Reappropriated Funds Federal Funds State Park Operations 64,834,343 63,934,343a 900,000b (332.1 FTE) Wildlife Operations7980 134,373,507 2,147,712 97,525,795c 34,700,000(I) 134,109,239 1,883,444 (731.8 FTE) Vendor Commissions, Fulfillment Fees, and Credit Card Fees 11,684,700 11,684,700d 210,892,550 210,628,282 a Of these amounts, $49,667,313 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S., $8,800,000(I) shall be from the Great Outdoors Colorado Program established in Section 1 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, $2,459,306(I) shall be from Lottery proceeds pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, $2,243,971 shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S., $641,063 shall be from the Off-highway Vehicle Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14.5-106 (1), C.R.S., and $122,690 shall be from the Snowmobile Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14-106 (1)(a), C.R.S. The appropriation from the Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(f), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, amounts appropriated from the Great Outdoors Colorado Program and lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated and are shown for informational purposes only. b This amount shall be from various sources of federal funds, including funds anticipated to be received from the United States Bureau of Reclamation through a cost-sharing agreement to address the net operating deficit of Paonia, Vega, Rifle Gap, Crawford, Navajo, Mancos, and Ridgway State Parks, and is shown for informational purposes only. c Of these amounts, $84,110,795 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., $8,800,000(I) shall be from the Great Outdoors Colorado Program established in Section 1 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, $3,000,000 shall be from the Wildlife Management Public Education Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (3.5)(a), C.R.S., $700,000 shall be from the Wolf Depredation Compensation Fund created in Section 33-1-128 (2)(a), C.R.S., $500,000 shall be from subscription revenues credited to the Colorado Outdoors Magazine Revolving Fund created in Section 33-1-114 (1), C.R.S., $400,000 shall be from the Colorado Nongame Conservation and Wildlife Restoration Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-125 (1)(a), C.R.S., and $15,000 shall be from the Federal Aid Projects Income Fund created in Section 33-1-119, C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, amounts appropriated from the Great Outdoors Colorado Program and lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated and are shown for informational purposes only. d Of this amount, an estimated $10,000,000 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $1,350,000 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $250,000 shall be from the Off-highway Vehicle Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14.5-106 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $31,700 shall be from the sale of migratory waterfowl stamps pursuant to Section 33-4-102.5 (2), C.R.S., and an estimated $53,000 shall be from the Snowmobile Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14-106 (1)(a), C.R.S. Agency Name or Title Item & Subtotal Total General Fund General Fund Exempt Cash Funds Reappropriated Funds Federal Funds TOTALS PART XV (NATURAL RESOURCES) $476,725,197 $57,345,170 $367,162,434a $9,587,533b $42,630,060c $476,460,929 $57,080,902 a Of this amount, $35,474,230 contains an (I) notation and an estimated $31,417,277 is from the Severance Tax Operational Fund pursuant to Section 39-29-109.3 (1), C.R.S. b Of this amount, $1,115,249 contains an (I) notation. c This amount contains an (I) notation. Footnotes: The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2. 79Department of Natural Resources, Division of Parks and Wildlife, Colorado Parks and Wildlife Operations, Wildlife Operations -- It is the General Assembly's intent that $2,100,000 $1,835,732 General Fund appropriated for this line item be used for the implementation of Proposition 114 for the reintroduction and management of gray wolves. SECTIONÂ 4.Â  Safety clause. The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state institutions. Signed By: James Rashad Coleman, Sr., President of the Senate Signed By: Julie McCluskie, Speaker of the House of Representatives Signed By: Esther van Mourik, Secretary of the Senate Signed By: Connor Randall, Signed By: Jared S. Polis, Governor of the State of Colorado